Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.175

Coroner not to be owner or employee of funeral home or mortuary—Counties with populations of forty thousand or more.

In each county with a population of forty thousand or more, no person shall be qualified for the office of county coroner as provided for in RCW 36.16.030 who is an owner or employee of any funeral home or mortuary.

[ 1991 c 363 s 54; 1969 ex.s. c 259 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.